Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16A.1395] FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO NONCITIZENS PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a noncitizen, whether lawfully present or undocumented, is not eligible for state financial assistance. For purposes of this section, "state financial assistance" means any payment, grant, loan, in-kind assistance, subsidy, public assistance, or other form of financial aid or assistance funded by state tax revenue. new text end